District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1405.01

Driver Education Program Fund.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 3, 1982, D.C. Law 4-97, § 9, 29 DCR 765
Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 301, 52 DCR 1700
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 6002, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9104, 58 DCR 6226

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-301.1.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6002 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6002 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 6001 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle A of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Driver Education Program and Fleet Program Amendment Act of 2009”.